Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 40 Private Schools
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-40-1.
Approval of secondary and higher schools — Certification to secretary of state.

No academy, college, university, or other institution of secondary or higher education shall be incorporated or established in this state or be permitted to transact business, unless exempt pursuant to §

16-40-10

, within this state unless and until:

Suitable provision, approved by the council on elementary and secondary education or the council on postsecondary education, shall be made that the academy, college, university, or institution is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and with the regulations and standards for approval adopted by the appropriate council or full board to implement this chapter; and

For institutions offering an associates degree or higher, the institution has initiated discussions, that are evidenced by a writing, with the New England Association of Schools and Colleges (NEASC) regarding potential accreditation; or

For distance-learning purposes only, a degree-granting institution has full accreditation by a regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education and equivalent to NEASC.

The secretary of state, upon the receipt by him or her under the provisions of the general laws of articles of association purporting to establish an educational institution, shall transmit the articles of association to the appropriate council and shall not issue the certificate of incorporation provided by the general laws unless and until the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or the commissioner of the office of postsecondary education shall file with the secretary of state a certificate over his or her signature that the appropriate council has approved the application for incorporation as complying with the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, §§ 10, 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-1

; P.L. 1975, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 58, § 1.

16-40-2.
Authority to grant degrees not presumed.

Authority to grant academic, collegiate, professional, or other degrees recognizing learning, scholarship, or achievement shall not be included in, or presumed to be part of, the functions of a corporation or of an institution of education unless its charter or the articles of association shall specifically indicate that the institution is nonprofit and specifically indicate the power to grant degrees and the nature of the degrees to be granted; and no corporation or association shall grant academic, collegiate, professional, or similar degrees without specific authorization; and for institutions offering an associates degree or higher, have received full New England Association of Schools and Colleges (NEASC) accreditation or for distance-learning purposes only, a degree-granting institution has full accreditation by a regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education and equivalent to NEASC within five (5) years of its incorporation or establishment within this state or five (5) years of being permitted to transact business within this state unless exempt pursuant to §

16-40-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-2

; P.L. 1987, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 58, § 1.

16-40-3.
Reference of charter amendments to boards.

The secretary of state, upon the receipt by him or her of amendments to a charter or articles of incorporation, as required by the general laws, which amendments shall add educational functions or the granting of degrees to the powers or purposes of any existing corporation, shall submit the proposed amendments to the board of regents for elementary and secondary education or the board of governors for higher education and shall not issue the certificate authorizing those changes unless and until he or she shall receive from the appropriate board a certificate that the changes subject to the provisions of §

16-40-1

have been approved by the appropriate board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-3

.

16-40-4.
Degrees without specific authority prohibited.

No academy, college, university, or institution of education conducted within this state, nor any officer or member of these, in recognition of the attainment or proficiency of any member of these, scholar, student, subscriber, or other person, in pursuing or graduating from any course or courses of study, arts, or learning conducted by it or another school, corporation, association, or institution, or in recognition of the attainment or achievement of any person, shall admit any person to the grade of a degree by conferring or by participating in conferring any degree upon any person or persons, except under the authority of a charter or articles of association specifically authorizing the granting of degrees, issued in accordance with the laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-4

.

16-40-5.
Revocation of approvals.

The approval of the appropriate board as provided in this chapter may for proper cause in the discretion of the appropriate board be revoked, after hearing upon twenty (20) days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing given, and of the reasons for the proposed revocation, to any private academy, college, university, or other institution of education by service upon any officer of these, upon proof made at the hearing to the satisfaction of the appropriate board that the provisions of this chapter, or the regulations or standards for approval adopted by the appropriate board to implement this chapter, have been violated by the academy, college, university, or other institution of education, or by the officers of these.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-5

; P.L. 1975, ch. 243, § 1.

16-40-6.
Degrees conferred after revocation of approval.

The admitting of any person or persons to any grade of a degree by conferring the degree upon that person or persons during the continuation of the revocation of the approval shall render this academy, college, university, or other institution of education, or any officer or member of these, participating in this, liable to the penalty provided in this chapter, as though no approval had been granted in the first instance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-6

.

16-40-7.
Register of approved schools and revocations.

The department of elementary and secondary education or the office of higher education shall keep a written record in a book to be provided and used solely for the purpose of recording in this book approvals and revocation of approvals at its office in Providence for the inspection of any person upon request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-7

.

16-40-8.
Penalty for violations.

Any academy, college, university, or institution of education or any person being an officer or agent of any academy, college, university, or institution of education incorporated under the laws of this state or transacting business within this state, who shall as an officer or agent, by vote or in any manner or capacity admit or participate in admitting any scholar or student, or any person in recognition of attainment or achievement, to any grade of a degree by conferring or participating in conferring a degree upon the scholar or student or person contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or contrary to the regulations or standards for approval adopted by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education or the board of governors for higher education to implement this chapter, or who shall sign any certificate or diploma as evidence of the conferring of the degree, shall be liable to a penalty of three hundred dollars ($300) for each offense to be sued for and recovered by and in the name of the department of elementary and secondary education or the office of higher education but to the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-8

; P.L. 1975, ch. 243, § 1.

16-40-9.
Prosecution of violations — Forfeiture of charter.

The district court for the sixth division is empowered, upon the filing of a complaint in writing, duly verified, which verification when made by the department of elementary and secondary education or the office of higher education may be made upon information and belief that any person has violated the provisions of this chapter, to issue process in the nature of a summons at the suit of the department or office as plaintiff; the summons shall be returnable in not less than five (5) and not more than fifteen (15) entire days; the process shall state in what respect this chapter has been violated by the defendant or defendants, and upon the return of the process, or at any time to which the trial shall be adjourned, the court shall proceed in a summary manner to hear testimony and to determine and give judgment in the matter, without the filing of any further pleadings for the plaintiff, for the recovery of the penalty with costs, or for the defendant or defendants, and the court shall, if judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, cause the defendant or defendants other than a body corporate who may refuse or fail immediately to pay the amount of the judgment rendered against the defendant or defendants, and all the costs and charges incident to it, to be imprisoned for any period not exceeding ninety (90) days. Upon any conviction under this section, the department or office shall immediately file in the office of the secretary of state as a public record the name of the corporation convicted or the name of any corporation whose officer or agent shall have been convicted, and upon filing, the charter or articles of association of the corporation shall become forfeited by reason of the conviction and the corporation shall cease to be a body corporate, except as provided in §

7-1.2-1324

, and the secretary of state shall immediately mail a notice of the forfeiture of charter or articles of association to the corporation at its last known address, but failure to receive the notice shall not invalidate the notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-9

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 32; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 11; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 11.

16-40-9.1.
Injunctive relief.

The superior court for the county of Providence is empowered to grant appropriate injunctive relief to the plaintiff for violation of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 243, § 2.

16-40-10.
Schools exempt.

Nothing contained in §§

16-40-1

through

16-40-1

8, except the provisions of §

16-40-3

, shall apply to any school or schools conducted under the public school system of this state, nor to any academy, college, university, or institution of education which shall have been established and conducted within this state for a period of ten (10) years prior to April 13, 1932, nor to any academy, college, university, or institution of education established by a special act of the general assembly of this state prior to January 1, 1987, nor to Roger Williams University in Bristol, Rhode Island.

Nothing contained in §§

16-40-1

through

16-40-1

8 shall apply to any postsecondary school or schools solely offering distance learning pursuant to an interstate reciprocity agreement for distance learning if:

The institution is situated in a state that is also participating in such agreement;

The institution has been approved to participate in such agreement by its home state and other entities with oversight of such agreement;

The institution has elected to participate in and operate in compliance with the terms of said agreement; and

The institution is and remains a member in good standing under the reciprocity agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1897, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 200, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-10

; P.L. 1987, ch. 504, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 231, § 1.

16-40-10.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 258, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 69, § 1, effective June 12, 2010.

16-40-10.2.
Mater Ecclesiae.

Notwithstanding any rule, regulation or general law to the contrary, the Mater Ecclesiae shall be authorized to grant associate and bachelor degrees provided that it is in compliance with regulations and standards for approval adopted by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education or the board of governors for higher education, as appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 500, § 1.

16-40-11.
Registration and reports of private schools.

All private schools or institutions of learning in this state shall be registered at the office of the department of elementary and secondary education or the office of higher education, the registry showing location, name, officers, or persons in charge, grade of instruction, and common language used in teaching. They shall also make a report annually in the month of July to the board of regents for elementary and secondary education or the board of governors for higher education showing the number of different pupils enrolled, the average attendance, the number of teachers employed, and any other facts of age, attendance, and subjects of instruction taught that the appropriate board may require.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 51, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 63, § 11; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 65, § 15; P.L. 1925, ch. 678, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 176, § 6; P.L. 1941, ch. 1032, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-11

.

16-40-12.
Schools instructing persons above compulsory school age.

All private schools offering instruction in any academic or vocational field to students above the compulsory school age shall be registered at the department of elementary and secondary education or the office of higher education, the registry showing the name of the school, the location, the names of the officers or persons in charge, the field or fields in which instruction is to be given, the rate of tuition to be charged, and the training and experience of the teachers. These schools shall not operate until they have received the approval of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education or the board of governors for higher education and shall continue to operate only as long as the approval remains in force. These schools shall report annually to the appropriate board, in the month of July, on prescribed forms furnished by the department or office, showing the number of different pupils enrolled, the fields of instruction covered, the length of the course, the number of teachers employed, and any other facts that the board may require.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 176, § 6; P.L. 1941, ch. 1032, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-12

.

16-40-13.
Promise of employment — Penalty for violations.

No private school shall promise or guarantee placement or employment as a means of inducing enrolment, and any person, firm, or corporation which conducts a school contrary to these regulations and without the approval of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education or the board of governors for higher education shall be considered guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 176, § 6; P.L. 1941, ch. 1032, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-13

.

16-40-14.
Schools unaffected.

Nothing contained in §§

16-40-11

through

16-40-13

shall be construed in a manner as to interfere in the operation of any secondary schools that were in existence on May 7, 1941, and which had been approved by the director of education or of private schools or institutions of learning in this state properly registered at the office of the department of elementary and secondary education or the office of higher education and which have been approved by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education or the board of governors for higher education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1032, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-14

.

16-40-15.
Registers and blanks.

The department of elementary and secondary education or the office of higher education shall provide registers for all private schools and institutions, and shall prepare blank forms of inquiry for the facts called for in §§

16-40-11

,

16-40-12

; and in doing so shall have special reference to the requirements of the office of education in Washington.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 51, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 63, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 65, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 176, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-40-15

.

16-40-16.
Student records and school closings — Notice of closing.

In the event that a private school shall close, provision must be made for continued access to student academic and attendance records. Records of elementary school students shall be sent to the receiving school, except that records of elementary and secondary parochial schools shall be sent to the catholic school office.

When a private secondary school closes, the school shall obtain the approval of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education as to the disposition of the attendance and academic records of the students.

Within thirty (30) days of the closing of a private postsecondary school, the person having care, custody and control of the records shall obtain the approval of the commissioner of higher education as to the disposition of student records.

The department of elementary and secondary education and the office of higher education may promulgate regulations for the custody and disposition of student records of private schools that cease operation.

No private academy, college, university, or other institution of higher education shall be permitted to close without first notifying the current students, any persons who have pre-paid tuition and deposits with the school, and the board of education of the impending closure of the school.

Such notice shall be provided in writing at least thirty (30) calendar days prior to the closing of the school, and shall include instructions on the procedures to be implemented:

To return any pre-paid tuition and/or other deposits to the students and/or persons who have made such deposits and tuition payments and for which instruction time will not be provided; and

To furnish students and the office of higher education with transcripts of courses, grades and credits and any other pertinent academic records regarding said students.

In the event a private academy, college, university, or other institution of higher education closes and does not provide the thirty (30) day notice as set forth in the preceding subsection, the private entity may be subject to a fine and/or other penalties as determined by the board of education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 437, § 1.